apertium-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="gry/zda__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zda</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdy</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdźe</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdu</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdu</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdźe</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdźe</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdowu</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdoma</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdźe</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdoma</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdoma</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdy</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdow</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdam</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdy</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdami</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zdach</l>
          <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pa/sta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sty</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sće</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stu</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stu</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sće</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sće</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stowu</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stoma</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sće</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stoma</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stoma</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sty</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stow</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stam</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sty</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stami</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stach</l>
          <r>sta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="integri/ta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>towu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tow</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tam</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tami</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tach</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fiksgwězda"><i>fiksgwě</i><par n="gry/zda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gryzda"><i>gry</i><par n="gry/zda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wuzda"><i>wu</i><par n="gry/zda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiesta"><i>fie</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kasta"><i>ka</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kista"><i>ki</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="langusta"><i>langu</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="njewjesta"><i>njewje</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasta"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pista"><i>pi</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plasta"><i>pla</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pěsta"><i>pě</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seksta"><i>sek</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tasta"><i>ta</i><par n="pa/sta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akta"><i>ak</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aorta"><i>aor</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bonita"><i>boni</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buleta"><i>bule</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buršenšafta"><i>buršenšaf</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chódota"><i>chódo</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debata"><i>deba</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dopłata"><i>dopła</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egalita"><i>egali</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epoleta"><i>epole</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etiketa"><i>etike</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feta"><i>fe</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flejta"><i>flej</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fregata"><i>frega</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gawota"><i>gawo</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="generalita"><i>generali</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="granata"><i>grana</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huta"><i>hu</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="integrita"><i>integri</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kajita"><i>kaji</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kantata"><i>kanta</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaseta"><i>kase</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kateta"><i>kate</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klarineta"><i>klarine</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komponenta"><i>komponen</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koordinata"><i>koordina</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krypta"><i>kryp</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuta"><i>ku</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kwantita"><i>kwanti</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kwinta"><i>kwin</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luta"><i>lu</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="margerita"><i>margeri</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marota"><i>maro</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moteta"><i>mote</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadkapacita"><i>nadkapaci</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opereta"><i>opere</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pH-gódnota"><i>pH-gódno</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pantoleta"><i>pantole</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikkoloflejta"><i>pikkoloflej</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pipeta"><i>pipe</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="placenta"><i>placen</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaketa"><i>plake</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pointa"><i>poin</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polarita"><i>polari</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosperita"><i>prosperi</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puta"><i>pu</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raketa"><i>rake</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rendita"><i>rendi</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="renta"><i>ren</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rewolta"><i>rewol</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roseta"><i>rose</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ruta"><i>ru</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serwieta"><i>serwie</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sonata"><i>sona</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soundkórta"><i>soundkór</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sromota"><i>sromo</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="standarta"><i>standar</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tableta"><i>table</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tapeta"><i>tape</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="termita"><i>termi</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tomata"><i>toma</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="waluta"><i>walu</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wata"><i>wa</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wjeta"><i>wje</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šalota"><i>šalo</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šansoneta"><i>šansone</i><par n="integri/ta__n"/></e>
